Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1,157
Merger of districts; approval by Chief Water Officer.

When such plan has been approved by the Chief Water Officer, it shall be designated as the final approved plan and shall be submitted to a vote as provided in section 46-1,158.

Laws 1972, LB 1509, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 93;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 67.